Idaho, session 2025, H0003.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 63-3004, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
63-3004. INTERNAL REVENUE CODE. The term "Internal Revenue Code"
means the Internal Revenue Code as amended and in effect on the first day of
January 2024 2025, except that Internal Revenue Code section 85 is applied
as in effect on January 1, 2020.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after its
passage and approval, and retroactively to January 1, 2025.